test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_3st_id_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - list: # from dictionary
  
    acâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aaccât
    aibâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aaibâš
    anestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aaneest
    anettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aaneet
    argâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aargâš
    arvâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aarvâš
    algâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aalgât
    amnâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aamnâst
    atâštiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aatâšt
    avâštiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aavâšt
    cahâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: caahâst
    cavâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: caavvâd
    cavâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: caavâst
    falâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: faallâl
    faskâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: faaskât
    hacâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haaccâg
    hacâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haaccât
    hajijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haajijd
    haldâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haaldâš
    halijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haalijd
    hamâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haamâst
    hardâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haardâš
    harijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haarijd
    harâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haarrâg
    hastâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haastâš
    havdârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haavdârd
    faškâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: faaškâst
    fađostiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: faađoost
    valgâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaalgâst
    valmâštiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaalmâšt
    valâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaallâd
    vandârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaandârd
    vanettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaaneet
    vardâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaardâš
    vavijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaavijd
    vavjâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaavjâš
    vazâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaazzât
    vazâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaazzâš
    vaibâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaaibâd
    vaigârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaaigârd
    vaikuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaaikut
    vainâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaainâg
    vajaskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaajaask
    vajâldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaajâld
    havrijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haavrijd
    havrâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haavrâd
    havrâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haavrâg
    havrâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haavrâst
    alaniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: allaan
    almaskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: almaask
    fastašiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fastaaš
    hapattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: happaat
    jalkkaattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jalkkat
    jamâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jaamâd
    kagâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaaggâst
    kagâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaaggât
    kagâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaagât
    kaivâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaaivâst
    kaiđâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaaiđât
    kalâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaalâš
    kamâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaamât
    kapšattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kapšaat
    karestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaareest
    kasašiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kassaaš
    kastâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaastâd
    kaverdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaaveerd
    kavpâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaavpâš
    kašmârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaašmârd
    kačâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaaččâd
    kađâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaađâst
    kačâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaaččât
    kađâštiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaađâšt
    lanjâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: laannjâs
    lanjâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: laanjâst
    lanâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: laannâd
    lapâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: laappâd
    lasaniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lassaan
    lavjâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: laavjât
    lađâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: laađâst
    macâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maaccâst
    macâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maaccât
    maigârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maaigârd
    mainâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maainâst
    mainâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maainâš
    majediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maajeed
    manâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maanâd
    mavsâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maavsât
    mavsâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maavsâš
    maŋaniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maŋnaan
    mađhâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maađhâš
    nanosmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: naanoosm
    navaliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: navvaal
    navdâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: naavdâš
    naveldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: naaveeld
    navkkaattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: navkkat
    pacâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paaccâd
    pacâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paaccât
    pahadiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paahaad
    pahudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paahud
    pahâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paahâd
    paimândiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paaimând
    paimâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paaimât
    pajaniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paijaan
    pajediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paajeed
    pajâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paaijâš
    palaskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paalaask
    palijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paalijd
    pancârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paancârd
    panâštiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paanâšt
    pappaattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pappat
    pastalmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pastaalm
    patâriđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paattâr
    paŋâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paaŋŋâl
    rahtâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: raahtâš
    ranjestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: raanjeest
    raseldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: raaseeld
    ravŋâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: raavŋâst
    rađijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: raađijd
    sagâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saaggâst
    sajâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saajâd
    salbâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saalbâst
    sargâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saargâst
    sarâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saarât
    satâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saatâš
    savâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saavvâst
    sačâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saaččâl
    tainâskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: taainâsk
    talsâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: taalsâd
    talâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: taallâst
    talâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: taalât
    tamadiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tammaad
    tamâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: taammâd
    tamâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: taammât
    tarbâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: taarbâš
    tavaniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tavvaan
    tavediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: taaveed
    tavâsmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taavvâsm

    čahâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čaahâd
    čalâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čaalâš
    čaraniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čarraan
    šarijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šaarijd
    časkâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čaaskât
    šavgârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šaavgârd
    šavijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šaavijd
    čaŋâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čaaŋâd
    čaŋâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čaaŋŋâl
    atâštiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: atâštâm
    vaibâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaibâd
    aldaniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aldan
    aldediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aldeed
    almottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: almoot
    avediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: avveed
    avžuuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: avžut
    aštâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aštâččâm
    capciistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: capcist
    fastodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fastod
    hamssâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hamssâl
    happiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: happit
    havriidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: havriid
    havvuustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: havvust
    haŋkettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haŋkeet
    adoptiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: adoptiim
    aitârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aitârdâm
    jalgodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jalgood
    jalhettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jalheet
    jaskodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jaskood
    kaimârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaimârdiđ
    kalliittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kallit
    kalmediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kalmeed
    kalmestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kalmeest
    kalmettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kalmeet
    kannattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kannat
    karodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: karrood
    karttuuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: karttut
    kasodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kassood
    kavestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kavveest
    kavettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kavveet
    kazerdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kazzeerd
    kašnettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kašneet
    laiđiistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: laiđist
    laiđiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: laiđit
    lakkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lakkit
    lappuustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lappust
    larmâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: larmâd
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lasseet
    latkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: latkit
    makkuuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: makkut
    maŋediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maŋŋeed
    nabdestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nabdeest
    nahettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nahheet
    nanošiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nannooš
    paddâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paddâs
    pajettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paijeet
    paldettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paldeet
    panttiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: panttit
    pargeldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pargeeld
    paseliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: passeel
    pasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: passeet
    paskiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paskit
    pasottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: passoot
    pavestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pavveest
    paštuuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paštuuttâm
    rammuustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rammust
    ranjestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rannjeest
    saheliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sahheel
    salttiistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: salttist
    sappadiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sappad
    sargâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sargâs
    savestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: savveest
    savjâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: savjâd
    saŋediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saŋŋeed

    tabediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tabbeed
    taistâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: taistâl
    taištâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: taištâl
    tamâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tamâttâm
    tapčasiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tapčas
    tapčestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tapčeest
    targodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: targood
    tarvettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tarveet
    vajediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaijeed
    valduuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: valdut
    valdâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: valdâlâm
    valdâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: valdâl
    valgâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: valgân
    vargiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vargit
    varjâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: varjâl
    čaittâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čaittâl
    šaldottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šaldoot
    čalgettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čalgeet
    čalmadiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čalmad
    čarviistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čarvist
    čarviittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čarvit
    časkeliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: časkelâm
    časkestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: časkestâm
    časkestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: časkeest
    časkettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: časkeet
    časkâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: časkâd
    čaŋâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čaŋâlâm
    heeviittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: heevitâm
    veerdušiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: veerduš
    jehâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jeehâl
    helijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: heelijd
    herkittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: heerkit
    hervâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: heervât
    hevâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: heevvân
    hevâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: heevât
    heŋgittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: heeŋgit
    heŋgâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: heeŋgâs
    heŋgâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: heeŋgâst
    ceggâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ceeggâd
    cegâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ceeggât
    ejâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eejâš
    elettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eeleet
    eliliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eellil
    elâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eellâl
    elâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eelâš
    enittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eennit
    epidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eeppid
    feilâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: feeilâst
    vekittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: veekkit
    verušiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: veerruš
    verâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: veerât
    kehâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: keehâd
    kejâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: keejâd
    kejâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: keeijâst
    kejâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: keejât
    kelijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: keelijd
    kemijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: keemijd
    kepidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: keeppid
    kesittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: keesit
    kesâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: keessâč
    kesâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: keessâš
    kezidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: keezzid
    kečidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: keeččid
    ledâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: leeddâg
    leeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: leijiim
    leeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: leijee
    lehâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: leehâst
    leihâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: leeihâš
    lendittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: leendit
    levâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: leevvân
    levâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: leevât
    mehistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: meehist
    merhâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: meerhâš
    meridiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: meerrid
    mevristiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: meevrist
    mečidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: meeččid
    pelhittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peelhit
    pelidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peellid
    perbildiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peerbild
    perustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peerust
    pevâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peevvâč
    peđeččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peeđeeč
    peđeččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peeđeeš
    peškittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peeškit
    peŋkâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peeŋkâst
    revviittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: reevvit
    segidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: seeggid
    selgâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: seelgât
    selvâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: seelvât
    selâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: seelât
    seviliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: seevvil
    sevtildiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: seevtild
    sevđijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: seevđijd
    tedâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: teeddâš
    teibârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: teeibârd
    terestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: teereest
    teškittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: teeškit
    čerediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čeereed
    čergijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čeergijd
    čergâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čeergâd
    čergâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čeergâst
    čerijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čeerijd
    čevârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čeevârd
